Arkansas, session 2025, HB1743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 2-37-102 is amended to read as follows:
2-37-102. Enforcing agency.
This chapter shall be administered by the State Plant Board Department
of Agriculture.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 2-37-103(a), concerning the definition of
"board" under the Arkansas Feed Law of 1997, is repealed.
(a) “Board” means the State Plant Board.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 2-37-103(o), concerning the definition of
"official sample" under the Arkansas Feed Law of 1997, is amended to read as
follows:
(o) “Official sample” means a sample of feed taken by the board
Department of Agriculture or its agent in accordance with the provisions of §
2-37-111(c), (e), or (f).

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 2-37-104 is amended to read as follows:
2-37-104. Registration and licensing.
(a)(1) Any person:
*CRH158*
03/10/2025 4:45:36 PM CRH158

HB1743
(A) Who manufactures a commercial feed within this state;
(B) Who distributes a commercial feed in or into the
state; or
(C) Whose name appears on the label of a commercial feed
as guarantor,
shall obtain a license for each facility which distributes in or
into the state authorizing him or her to manufacture or distribute commercial
feed before he or she engages in such activity.
(2) Any person who makes only retail sales of commercial feed
which bears labeling or other approved indication that the commercial feed is
from a licensed manufacturer, guarantor, or distributor who has assumed full
responsibility for the sum due for tonnage inspection fee due under this
chapter is not required to obtain a license.
(b)(1)(A) A person who is required to obtain a license shall submit an
application on a form provided or approved by the State Plant Board
Department of Agriculture.
(B) The sum accompanied by a license fee of ten dollars
($10.00) shall be paid to the board department for each facility for which a
license shall be issued.
(C) The department The board shall remit such license fees
the sum to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the State Treasury to the
credit of the Plant Board Fund for the sole use of the board in order to
carry out the State Plant Board's functions, powers, and duties.
(2) A license shall expire on the last day of December of the
year for which it is issued; provided that any license shall be valid through
ninety (90) days of the next ensuing year or until the issuance of the
renewal license, whichever event first occurs, if the holder thereof has
filed a renewal application with the board department on or before December
31st of the year for which the current license was issued.
(3) A new applicant who fails to obtain a license within fifteen
(15) working days after notification of the requirement to obtain a license,
or any licensee who fails to comply with license renewal requirements, shall
pay a the sum of thirty-dollars late fee ($30.00) in addition to the sum paid
for the license fee.
(c) The form and content of the commercial feed license application
shall be established by rules adopted by the board.
03/10/2025 4:45:36 PM CRH158

HB1743
(d) The board department may, at any time, request from a license
applicant or licensee copies of labels and labeling in order to determine
compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
(e)(1) The board department is empowered to refuse to issue a license
to any person not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The board may suspend or revoke any license issued to any
person found not in compliance with any provision of this chapter.
(3) The board may place conditions that limit production or
distribution of a particular commercial feed on the license of any person
found not to be in compliance with this chapter.
(4) No license shall be conditioned, suspended, refused or
revoked unless the applicant or licensee shall first be given an opportunity
to be heard before the board in order to comply with the requirements of this
chapter.
(f)(1) In order to be exempt from the provisions of this chapter,
integrated operators, as defined in § 2-37-103, shall submit an application
for exemption on a form provided or approved by the board accompanied by an
application fee department.
(2) The sum of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be paid for each
facility for which an exemption shall be issued.
(3) The board shall remit such application fees the sum paid
under subdivision (f)(2) of this section to the Treasurer of State for
deposit into the State Treasury to the credit of the Plant Board Fund to be
used solely by the board to carry out the board's functions, powers, and
duties.
(g) A grower's production of unmanipulated poultry litter is exempt
from the provisions of this chapter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 2-37-108(g), concerning the prohibited act
of failing to pay inspection fees and file reports under the Arkansas Feed
Law of 1997, is amended to read as follows:
(g) Failure to pay sums for inspection fees and file reports as
required by § 2-37-109.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 2-37-109 is amended to read as follows:
2-37-109. Inspection fees and reports.
03/10/2025 4:45:36 PM CRH158

HB1743
(a) An inspection fee at the rate The sum of thirty cents ($.30) per
ton shall be paid on commercial feeds distributed in this state by the person
whose name appears on the label as the manufacturer, guarantor or
distributor, except that a person other than the manufacturer, guarantor or
distributor may assume liability for the inspection fee cost, subject to the
following:
(1) No fee A sum shall not be paid on a commercial feed if the
payment has been made by a previous distributor.
(2) No fee A sum shall not be paid on customer-formula feeds if
the inspection fee is paid on the commercial feeds which are used as
ingredients therein.
(3)(A) No fee A sum shall not be paid on commercial feeds which
are used as ingredients for the manufacture of commercial feeds.
(B) If the fee sum has already been paid, credit shall be
given for such payment.
(4)(A) On commercial feed distributed in quantities of twenty-
five (25) thirty-four (34) tons or less, a minimum fee sum of ten dollars
($10.00) per quarterly report shall be paid.
(B) A tonnage report and minimum fee sum is due for each
reporting period, even though no distribution of commercial feeds occurred in
the state during that period.
(b) Each person who is liable for the payment of such fee sum shall:
(1) File, not later than the last day in January, April, July,
and October of each year, a quarterly statement, setting forth the number of
net tons of commercial feeds distributed in this state during the preceding
three (3) months; and upon. After filing such statement shall pay the
inspection fee the quarterly statement, the Department of Agriculture shall
invoice the responsible party at the rate stated in subsection (a) of this
section. Inspection fees costs which are due and owing and have not been
remitted to the State Plant Board department within fifteen (15) days
following the date due shall have a penalty fee of fifteen percent (15%) or
twenty-five dollars ($25.00), whichever is the higher, added to the amount
due when payment is finally made. The assessment of this penalty fee shall
not prevent the board from taking other actions as provided in this chapter.
(2) Keep such records as may be necessary or required by the
board department to indicate accurately the tonnage of commercial feed
03/10/2025 4:45:36 PM CRH158

HB1743
distributed in this state, and the board department shall have the right to
examine such records to verify statements of tonnage. Failure to make an
accurate statement of tonnage or to pay the inspection fee costs or comply as
provided herein shall constitute sufficient cause for the cancellation of the
license of a distributor. However, no license shall be canceled or revoked
before the distributor has been given an opportunity to be heard before the
board and to pay the fees sums owed under this section.
(c) Fees Sums collected shall constitute a fund for the payment of the
costs of inspection, sampling, and analysis, and other expenses necessary for
administration of this chapter and shall be deposited into the State Treasury
to the credit of the State Plant Board Fund.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code §§ 2-37-111 through 2-37-114 are amended to
read as follows:
2-37-111. Inspection, sampling, and analysis.
(a) For the purpose of enforcement of this chapter, and in order to
determine whether its provisions have been complied with, including whether
or not any operations may be subject to such provisions, officers or
employees designated by the State Plant Board Department of Agriculture, upon
presenting appropriate credentials, and notice to the owner, operator, or
agent in charge, are authorized:
(1) To enter, during normal business hours, any factory,
warehouse, or establishment within the state in which commercial feeds are
manufactured, processed, packed, or held for distribution, or to enter any
vehicle being used to transport or hold such feeds; and
(2) To inspect at reasonable times and within reasonable limits
and in a reasonable manner, such factory, warehouse, establishment or vehicle
and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers,
and labeling herein. The inspection may include the verification of only such
records, and production and control procedures as may be necessary to
determine compliance with the good manufacturing practice rules established
under § 2-37-107(15).
(b) Notice shall be given for each such inspection, but a notice shall
not be required for each entry made during the period covered by the
inspection. Each such inspection shall be commenced and completed with
reasonable promptness. Upon completion of the inspection the person in charge
03/10/2025 4:45:36 PM CRH158

HB1743
of the facility or vehicle shall be so notified.
(c) If the owner of any factory, warehouse, or establishment described
in subsection (a), or his or her agent, refuses to admit the board department
or its agent to inspect in accordance with subsections (a) and (b), the board
department is authorized to obtain from any state court a warrant directing
such owner or his or her agent to submit premises described in such warrant
to inspection.
(d) For the enforcement of this chapter, the board department or its
designated agent is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises
including any vehicle of transport during regular business hours to have
access to, and to obtain samples, and to examine records relating to
distribution of commercial feeds.
(e) Sampling and analysis shall be conducted in accordance with
methods published by the AOAC International or in accordance with other
generally recognized methods.
(f) The results of all analyses of official samples shall be forwarded
by the board department to the person named on the label and to the
purchaser. When the inspection and analysis of an official sample indicates a
commercial feed has been adulterated or misbranded and upon request within
thirty (30) days following the receipt of the analysis the board department
shall furnish to the registrant or licensee a portion of the sample
concerned.
(g) The board department, in determining for administrative purposes
whether a commercial feed is deficient in any component, shall be guided by
the official sample as defined in § 2-37-103(o) and obtained and analyzed as
provided for in subsections (d) and (e) of this section.

2-37-112. Detained commercial feeds.
(a) Withdrawal from Distribution Orders.
(1) (A) When the State Plant Board Department of Agriculture or
its authorized agent has reasonable cause to believe any lot of commercial
feed is being distributed in violation of any of the provisions of this
chapter or any of the prescribed rules under this chapter, the board
department may issue and enforce a written or printed “withdrawal from
distribution” order, warning the distributor not to dispose of the lot of
commercial feed in any manner until written permission is given by the board
03/10/2025 4:45:36 PM CRH158

HB1743
department or the court.
(B) The board department shall release the lot of
commercial feed so withdrawn when the provisions and rules have been complied
with.
(C) If compliance is not obtained the board department may
begin, or upon request of the distributor or registrant, shall begin
proceedings for condemnation.
(2) A withdrawal from distribution order issued under this
section expires thirty (30) days after the day it was first issued unless
condemnation proceedings have begun in a court of competent jurisdiction.
(b) Condemnation and Confiscation.
(1) Any lot of commercial feed not in compliance with the
provisions and rules shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the board
State Plant Board to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which
the commercial feed is located.
(2)(A) In the event the court finds the commercial feed to be in
violation of this chapter and orders the condemnation of the commercial feed,
it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the
commercial feed and the laws of the state.
(B) However, in no instance shall the disposition of the
commercial feed be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an
opportunity to apply to the court for release of the commercial feed or for
permission to process or re-label the commercial feed to bring it into
compliance with this chapter.
(3) If the court orders the sale of the feed, the proceeds from
the sale shall be remitted to the Treasurer of State to be credited to the
General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund.

2-37-113. Penalties.
(a) A person convicted of violating any of the provisions of this
chapter or who shall impede, hinder, or otherwise prevent, or attempt to
prevent, the State Plant Board Department of Agriculture or its authorized
agent in performance of his or her duty in connection with the provisions of
this chapter, shall be adjudged guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of
not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first violation, and not more
than two hundred dollars ($200) for each subsequent violation, and the
03/10/2025 4:45:36 PM CRH158

HB1743
proceeds from such fines shall be remitted into the State Treasury to the
credit of the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the board
department or its representative to:
(1) Report for prosecution;
(2) Institute seizure proceedings; or
(3) Issue a withdrawal from distribution order, as a result of
minor violations of this chapter, or when the board department believes the
public interest will best be served by suitable notice of warning in writing.
(c) In all prosecutions for violations of this chapter, the
certificate of the analyst, or other officer making the analysis or
examination, when sworn to or subscribed by the analyst or officer, shall be
prima facie evidence of the facts therein certified.
(d) The board State Plant Board is authorized to apply for and the
court to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person
from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this chapter
or any rule promulgated under this chapter notwithstanding the existence of
other remedies at law. The injunction shall be issued without bond.
(e) A person adversely affected by an act, order, or ruling of the
board made under the provisions of this chapter may within forty-five (45)
days thereafter bring action in the Pulaski County Circuit Court for judicial
review of the actions. The form of the proceeding may be any which may be
provided by statutes of this state to review decisions of administrative
agencies, or in the absence or inadequacy thereof, any applicable form of
legal action, including actions for declaratory judgments or writs of
prohibitory or mandatory injunctions.
(f) A person who uses to his or her own advantage, or reveals to other
than the board or officers of the board or other officers of state agencies,
or to the courts when relevant in any judicial proceeding, any information
acquired under the authority of this chapter, concerning any method, records,
formulations, or processes which as a trade secret is entitled to protection,
is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor; provided, that this prohibition shall not
be deemed as prohibiting the board or its authorized agent, from exchanging
information of a regulatory nature with authorized officials of the United
States Government, or of other states, who are similarly prohibited by law
from revealing this information.
03/10/2025 4:45:36 PM CRH158

HB1743

2-37-114. Cooperation with other entities.
The State Plant Board Department of Agriculture may cooperate with and
enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states,
agencies of the United States Government, and private associations in order
to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.






























03/10/2025 4:45:36 PM CRH158